Hawaii statutes.
§655-1 Deposit in court or delivery to
party. When it is admitted, by the pleading or examination of a party,
that the party has in the party's possession, or under the party's control, any
money, or other thing, capable of delivery, which, being the subject of the
litigation, is held by the party as trustee for another person, or which
belongs, or is due, to another person, the court may order the same, upon
motion, to be deposited in court, or delivered to the party, upon such
conditions as may be just, subject to the further direction of the court. [CC
1859, §1153; RL 1925, §2383; RL 1935, §4117; RL 1945, §10231; RL 1955, §243-1;
HRS §655-1; am L 1972, c 89, §6(a); gen ch 1985]

Rules of Court

See HRCP rule 67; DCRCP rule 67.

Case Notes

Cited: 48 H. 349, 364, 402 P.2d 683 (1965).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next